Mississippi statutes. Title 55. Parks and Recreation
In General

§ 55-3-1.
Gifts of land for state forests and parks.

The governor of the state is authorized to accept gifts of land to the state, not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the area of any county, to be held, protected, and administered by the State Forestry Commission as state forests and parks and to be used to demonstrate their practical utility for reforestation and as breeding places for wild game, and he is authorized to accept gifts of land to be used and administered by the commission as state parks. Such gifts must be absolute, except for the reservation of any or all mineral rights, and in no case shall exceed ten percent (10%) of the area of any county wherein such lands may be situated. The Attorney General is directed to see that all deeds to the state are properly executed and that the titles thereto are free and clear of all encumbrances before the gift is accepted. When any donation exceeding six hundred acres is made, the name of the donor or any name he may suggest, on the approval of the commission shall be given such donation as the designation of such forest or park.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6166; 1942, § 6024; Laws, 1926, ch. 161.

§ 55-3-2.
Definitions.

For purposes of Chapter 3, Title 55, Mississippi Code of 1972, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Executive director” means the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 100, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 55-3-3.
Reconveyance to donor, heirs, etc., of unused lands donated to state.

Where any land has been donated to the state and a deed thereof has been accepted by the governor, for the purpose of establishing thereon state forests and parks in accordance with the provisions of Section 55-3-1, and the state forestry commissioner certifies in writing to the secretary of state that the land has not been used as a part of any state forest or park for a period of time not less than five (5) years from the date of conveyance of said land, the secretary of state is authorized and empowered, in his discretion, with the approval of the governor to reconvey the land to the donor, his heirs, representatives or assigns.

The price to be paid by the donor, his heirs, representatives or assigns, upon the reconveyance of said land shall be sufficient to cover the nominal consideration paid by the state for the land originally, if there be any such consideration, together with the cost of any improvements placed by the state or any agency thereof upon the land, and any sums of money expended in caring for and maintaining the land or any other expense incurred by the state or any agency thereof in connection therewith.

The deed from the state to the donor, his heirs, representatives or assigns, shall state the true consideration therefor, and where made in good faith by all parties, shall convey the entire right, title and interest of the state therein.

Any such deed from the state to the donor, his heirs, representatives or assigns, shall be recorded at the expense of the donor, his heirs, representatives or assigns, in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which the land is located, and a failure to so record the deed shall render the same void.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6024.5; Laws, 1952, ch. 194, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1978, ch. 458, § 25, eff from and after January 1, 1980.

§ 55-3-5.
Survey of state land.

The department is authorized to survey, or cause to be surveyed, all areas of land owned by the state for the purpose of determining the adaptability of such areas for use as state parks, state forests and/or game and fish preserves to be developed for the control of stream flow and erosion, recreation, game and fish refuges or preserves, forest preserves, and for other similar uses.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6033; Laws, 1934, ch. 153; Laws, 1987, ch. 371, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 101, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 55-3-7.
Transfer and dedication of lands for use as state forests, parks, etc.

The commission shall investigate and determine whether or not the public interests may be served by the utilization of any lands owned by the State of Mississippi, for state forests, parks, game and fish preserves, recreation centers, and for other public purposes, and the findings of the commission shall be submitted to the board of supervisors of the county wherein such lands lie. Thereupon the clerk of the board of supervisors shall post, or cause to be posted, in three (3) public places in said county, one (1) of which shall be the courthouse of said county, a notice setting out the findings of the commission and describing the lands involved and reciting that a hearing will be had before said board at its first regular meeting held after the expiration of twenty-one (21) days from the date of posting such notice, and that at such meeting any objections to the proposed transfer and dedication will be heard. Furthermore, the chancery clerk shall send by registered mail, with a return receipt requested, a copy of such notice to each person shown by the assessment rolls to have been the owner or of any of the lands concerned should such lands have been sold for taxes. However, any irregularity in the giving of such notice, either by posting or by mail, shall not invalidate any transfer or dedication made. After such hearing, the board of supervisors shall spread its findings upon its minutes, and if the transfer and dedication be approved, a certified copy of such findings shall be forwarded to the commission. The commission upon receipt of such resolution shall forward the same, together with its findings as to the description of such transfer and dedication, to the Governor. If he finds that the board of supervisors of the county wherein such lands lie has approved such transfer and dedication, he may, in his discretion, set aside and dedicate any lands owned by the state for such purposes above mentioned. After the Governor has proclaimed, set aside and dedicated any lands for such purposes, the same shall not thereafter be sold. However, no lands forfeited to the state for nonpayment of taxes thereon shall be so transferred and dedicated until after the expiration of eighteen (18) months after the date of maturity of such tax titles in the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6034; Laws, 1934, ch. 153; Laws, 1987, ch. 371, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 102, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 55-3-9.
Exchange of lands by state and private landowner.

If in the opinion of the commission, it is necessary to consolidate state lands for more economical administration as state parks and state forests, the Secretary of State, by and with the approval of the Governor, is authorized to exchange with individuals or corporations any state lands for other lands owned by individuals or corporations. The owner of such private lands shall make application for such exchange. In event such exchange is applied for, the Secretary of State is authorized to issue a patent, as provided by the existing statutes, to any landowner, upon the execution and delivery by the landowner of a deed conveying to the state land of equivalent value.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6035; Laws, 1934, ch. 153; Laws, 1987, ch. 371, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 103, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 55-3-11.
Control and management of lands.

The State Forestry Commission shall have the control and management of any and all forests or public parks set aside and dedicated as provided for in Section 55-3-7, and shall have authority to issue grazing or farming permits or leases on said parks, and to make sales of timber and other forest products of the soil from same. The Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall have the control and management of any and all lands set aside and dedicated for a fish and game refuge and/or preserve. The State Forestry Commission and the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall cooperate in the utilization of any lands so dedicated both for forestry and game and fish conservation purposes.

In the case of state forests and/or state parks the State Forestry Commission, and, in the case of fish and game preserves, the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, is hereby vested with authority to institute proceedings against trespassers and others in the name of the State of Mississippi, and to do all things necessary and proper to obtain the most complete and advantageous developments of state forests, parks, and fish and game preserves.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6036; Laws, 1934, ch. 153; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 104, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 55-3-13.
Purchase or condemnation by counties of lands to be given to state; source of funds.

The board of supervisors of any county in the state is hereby authorized and empowered to purchase or acquire by eminent domain land to be conveyed to the state for state parks, forests and other purposes, as herein provided, and, for that purpose, is authorized and empowered to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund. Said board shall have the authority to borrow money to make any such purchases of lands, in anticipation of the collection of taxes for the payment thereof. However, no lands occupied as a bona fide homestead shall be subjected to such power of eminent domain.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6037; Laws, 1934, ch. 153; Laws, 1935, ch. 54; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 40, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 55-3-15.
Disposition of revenues.

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the gross revenue derived from state forests shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the general fund. Twenty-five percent (25%) derived from state forests shall be paid into the school fund of the county from which the revenue is derived, payment being made to the county as compensation for possible loss of revenue. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the gross revenue derived from fish and game refuges and/or preserves created and established by the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks in conjunction with the commission created in Section 55-3-5 shall be paid to the fisheries and wildlife fund of the state to be expended as other funds of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks are expended, and twenty-five percent (25%) of such gross revenue shall be paid into the school fund of the county from which the revenue is derived.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6038; Laws, 1934, ch. 153; Laws, 1982, ch. 365, § 11; Laws, 1995, ch. 438, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 55-3-17.
Transfer of lands by drainage districts.

Any drainage district, acting through the drainage commissioners of said district, as organized and provided in Title 51, Chapters 27, 29, 31, of the Mississippi Code of 1972, is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to transfer to the State of Mississippi, free of any and all liens, any lands purchased by such drainage district for nonpayment of taxes. However, no such transfer shall be made except that it be stated in the deed of conveyance that the lands so transferred shall be dedicated and used by the State of Mississippi as provided in Sections 55-3-5 through 55-3-15.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6040; Laws, 1934, ch. 232.

§ 55-3-19.
Exercise of power of eminent domain when federal and state governments are establishing major park and forest and game reserve.

Where the federal government and the state government or any subdivision thereof are cooperating in the establishment of a major park and forest and game reserve, and where the property owners in the territory therein involved have agreed to convey as much as fifty percent (50%) of the area required for said purposes, the State Forestry Commission, together with the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or any subdivision of the state, are hereby empowered to exercise the right of eminent domain in the manner now provided by law to obtain the necessary lands needed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6045; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 37; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 105, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 55-3-21.
Kurtz State Forest.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a revolving fund to be used by the State Forestry Commission to carry out the provisions of the will of William W. Kurtz, dated July 12, 1940, which donated one thousand seven hundred sixty (1,760) acres of forestland in Greene County to the State of Mississippi to be held, protected, administered and improved by the State Forestry Commission as a state forest. The fund shall be called the Kurtz State Forest Revolving Fund, and money for the fund shall accrue from any revenues derived from the Kurtz State Forest including, but not limited to, timber sales, hunting leases, permit fees, and stump and naval stores operations. The State Forestry Commission is authorized to expend a portion of the moneys in the fund to purchase in the name of the State of Mississippi other lands, not to exceed five hundred (500) acres, which are contiguous to or located near the lands donated by the Kurtz will, for the purpose of expanding the Kurtz State Forest. The State Forestry Commission also may expend moneys in the fund for the purposes described in Section 55-3-23. The State Treasurer shall invest all moneys in the fund, and interest earned on the investments shall be paid back into the fund and not into the General Fund. The fund shall be audited annually by the State Auditor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 430; Laws, 1993, ch 622, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1993).

§ 55-3-23.
Maintenance of cemetery where donors of Kurtz State Forest buried.

The Mississippi Forestry Commission is authorized, annually, to pay to the State Line Cemetery Association, out of the proceeds and receipts derived from timber sales in the Kurtz State Forest, an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for the upkeep of the cemetery in which W. W. Kurtz and wife, the donors of Kurtz State Forest, are buried.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1955, ch. 253; Laws, 1993, ch 622, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1993).